Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.200

Agency rules.

(1) Each agency may adopt rules consistent with law, for use within the agency to protect against violations of this chapter.

(2) Each agency proposing to adopt rules under this section shall forward the rules to the appropriate ethics board before they may take effect. The board may submit comments to the agency regarding the proposed rules.

(3) This section applies to institutions of higher education only to the extent their activities are not subject to RCW 42.52.220.

[ 2022 c 173 s 2; 2005 c 106 s 3; 1994 c 154 s 120.]